Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB910.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 218A.500 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this section and KRS 218A.510:
(1) "Drug paraphernalia" means all equipment, products, and materials of any kind
which are used, intended for use, or designed for use in planting, propagating,
cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting,
producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging,
storing, containing, concealing, injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise
introducing into the human body a controlled substance in violation of this chapter.
The term "drug paraphernalia" does not include medicinal cannabis accessories as
defined in KRS 218B.010. It includes but is not limited to:
(a) Kits used, intended for use, or designed for use in planting, propagating,
cultivating, growing, or harvesting of any species of plant which is a
controlled substance or from which a controlled substance can be derived;
(b) Kits used, intended for use, or designed for use in manufacturing,
compounding, converting, producing, processing, or preparing controlled
substances;
(c) Isomerization devices used, intended for use, or designed for use in increasing
the potency of any species of plant which is a controlled substance;
(d) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, testing equipment used,
intended for use, or designed for use in analyzing the strength, effectiveness,
or purity of controlled substances;
(e) Scales and balances used, intended for use, or designed for use in weighing or
measuring controlled substances;
(f) Diluents and adulterants, such as quinine hydrochloride, mannitol, mannite,
dextrose, and lactose[,] used, intended for use, or designed for use in cutting
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2491
controlled substances;
(g) Separation gins and sifters used, intended for use, or designed for use in
removing twigs and seeds from, or in otherwise cleaning or refining
marijuana;
(h) Blenders, bowls, containers, spoons, and mixing devices used, intended for
use, or designed for use in compounding controlled substances;
(i) Capsules, balloons, envelopes, and other containers used, intended for use, or
designed for use in packaging small quantities of controlled substances;
(j) Containers and other objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in
storing or concealing controlled substances;
(k) Hypodermic syringes, needles, and other objects used, intended for use, or
designed for use in parenterally injecting controlled substances into the human
body; and
(l) Objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in ingesting, inhaling, or
otherwise introducing marijuana, cocaine, hashish, or hashish oil into the
human body, such as: metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or ceramic
pipes with or without screens, permanent screens, hashish heads, or punctured
metal bowls; water pipes; carburetion tubes and devices; smoking and
carburetion masks; roach clips, which means[mean] objects used to hold
burning material, such as marijuana cigarettes, that have become too small or
too short to be held in the hand; miniature cocaine spoons, and cocaine vials;
chamber pipes; carburetor pipes; electric pipes; air-driven pipes; chillums;
bongs; and ice pipes or chillers.
(2) It is unlawful for any person to use, or to possess with intent to use, drug
paraphernalia for the purpose of planting, propagating, cultivating, growing,
harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing,
preparing, testing, analyzing, packing, repacking, storing, containing, concealing,
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2491
injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body a
controlled substance in violation of this chapter.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to deliver, possess with intent to deliver, or
manufacture with intent to deliver, drug paraphernalia, knowing, or under
circumstances where one reasonably should know, that it will be used to plant,
propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce,
process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest,
inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance in
violation of this chapter.
(4) It is unlawful for any person to place in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or
other publication any advertisement, knowing, or under circumstances where one
reasonably should know, that the purpose of the advertisement, in whole or in part,
is to promote the sale of objects designed or intended for use as drug paraphernalia.
(5) (a) This section shall not prohibit a local health department from operating a
substance abuse treatment outreach program which allows participants to
exchange hypodermic needles and syringes.
(b) To operate a substance abuse treatment outreach program under this
subsection, the local health department shall have the consent, which may be
revoked at any time, of the local board of health and:
1. The legislative body of the first or home rule class city in which the
program would operate if located in such a city; and
2. The legislative body of the county, urban-county government, or
consolidated local government in which the program would operate.
(c) Items exchanged at the program shall not be deemed drug paraphernalia under
this section while located at the program.
(6) (a) Prior to searching a person, a person's premises, or a person's vehicle, a peace
officer may inquire as to the presence of needles or other sharp objects in the
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2491
areas to be searched that may cut or puncture the officer and offer to not
charge a person with possession of drug paraphernalia if the person declares
to the officer the presence of the needle or other sharp object. If, in response
to the offer, the person admits to the presence of the needle or other sharp
object prior to the search, the person shall not be charged with or prosecuted
for possession of drug paraphernalia for the needle or sharp object or for
possession of a controlled substance for residual or trace drug amounts
present on the needle or sharp object.
(b) The exemption under this subsection shall not apply to any other drug
paraphernalia that may be present and found during the search or to controlled
substances present in other than residual or trace amounts.
(7) (a) This section shall not prohibit the retail sale of hypodermic syringes and
needles without a prescription in pharmacies.
(b) Hypodermic syringe and needle inventory of a pharmacy shall not be deemed
drug paraphernalia under this section.
(c) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, [narcotic ]drug
testing products or equipment, including but not limited to test strips,
used or intended for use to determine whether a substance[utilized in
determining whether a controlled substance] contains a controlled
substance, synthetic drug, or any chemical or compound that may
cause physical harm or death[opioid or its analogues] shall not be
deemed drug paraphernalia under this section.
2. A [narcotic ]drug testing product or equipment that is utilized in
conjunction with the importation, manufacture, or selling of fentanyl or
a fentanyl analogue in violation of this chapter shall be deemed drug
paraphernalia under this section.
(d) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, possession of a [narcotic
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2491
]drug testing product or equipment used in accordance with paragraph (c)1. of
this subsection that contains residual or trace amounts of a synthetic opioid or
an analogue thereof shall not be prosecuted as possession of a controlled
substance under [any provision of ]this chapter.
(8) Any person who violates [any provision of ]this section shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:26 PM Jacketed